Idaho, session 2025, H0453.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support Pro-
gram's Division of Facilities $586,300 from the Public School Income Fund
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Public Schools Educational Support Program's
Division of Facilities is hereby reduced by $2,156,400 from the School Dis-
tricts Facilities Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $586,300 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Facil-
ities, $586,300 shall be considered expended from the General Fund for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. Of the amounts reduced in Section 2 of this act for the Public
Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Facilities, $2,156,400
shall be reduced from the amounts considered expended from the School Dis-
tricts Facilities Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.